Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-558
Violations; penalty; effect.

Any individual or business entity engaged in the business of abstracting in this state without having complied with the Abstracters Act shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Violation of the Abstracters Act shall in no way be construed to preclude the liability of a holder of a certificate of authority, a registered abstracter, any person holding himself or herself out to be a registered abstracter or a holder of a certificate of authority, or any person illegally engaged in the business of abstracting in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1965, c. 453, § 19, p. 1445;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 208;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 76-527;

Laws 1985, LB 47, § 28.

"Preparing written reports of title to real property" constitutes the "business of abstracting" for purposes of the Abstracters Act only when done in exchange for a fee or other valuable consideration. So construed, the Abstracters Act is not unconstitutionally overbroad on its face. State v. Rabourn, 269 Neb. 499, 693 N.W.2d 291 (2005).